Utah statutes.
59-14-504.   Responsibility for placement of warning labels -- One label
required.
It is the intent and purpose of this part to require all manufacturers,
jobbers, wholesalers, and distributors to securely affix the warning labels
required by Section 59-14-501.  When warning labels are affixed as required by
this part, no additional warning label is required, regardless of how often
the articles are sold or resold in the state.
